Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Kentucky Horse Park Commission

148.258.
Definition.

As used in KRS 148.260 to 148.320 the term “commission” shall mean the “Kentucky Horse Park Commission” unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 96, § 1, effective July 15, 1986.

148.260.
Kentucky Horse Park Commission — Members — Terms — Meetings — Reimbursement for expenses — Bylaws — Advisory committee.

There is hereby created and established an agency of state government to be known as the Kentucky Horse Park Commission, which shall constitute a separate administrative body of state government within the meaning of KRS 12.010(8) and under the provisions of KRS 12.015 shall be attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet for administrative purposes.

The commission shall be composed of the following fifteen (15) members:

Thirteen (13) members appointed by the Governor who possess the ability to provide broad management expertise and direction in the operation of the Kentucky Horse Park and , to the extent possible, represent the diverse interests of the Kentucky horse industry, four (4) or more of whom represent the equine industry and four (4) or more of whom are active in industry, tourism, or commerce. The members of the commission appointed under this paragraph shall serve for a term of four (4) years, except that initial appointments shall be as follows:

Four (4) members shall serve for a term of two (2) years;

Five (5) members shall serve for a term of three (3) years; and

Four (4) members shall serve for a term of four (4) years; and

The secretary of the Cabinet for Economic Development and the secretary of the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet, who shall serve as ex officio members with full voting rights.

The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the commission to serve as chairperson and one (1) member of the commission to serve as vice chairperson, both of whom shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor. The vice chairperson shall preside over meetings in the absence of the chairperson.

The commission shall meet quarterly, and the chairperson shall preside over the meetings. The chairperson may call special meetings of the commission upon a request of the majority of the members of the commission, or upon request of the Governor.

Members shall be reimbursed only for expenses incurred in the discharge of official business, subject to regulations established by the Finance and Administration Cabinet. All expenses reimbursed to members shall be paid from operating funds of the Kentucky Horse Park.

The commission shall establish and maintain an office at the Kentucky State Horse Park for the transaction of its business and shall not establish any branch office. The commission may hold meetings at any other place when the convenience of the commission requires.

The commission shall be authorized to adopt bylaws providing for the call of its meetings, which shall be held at least quarterly, and for its operating procedures. A quorum of the commission shall consist of eight (8) members, and a quorum of members present at any duly-called meeting may act upon any matter before it for consideration. Each member shall have one (1) vote.

The Governor may establish an advisory committee to advise in the administration, development, and operation of the Kentucky Horse Park or other functions, activities, and programs provided for or authorized by KRS 148.260 to 148.320.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 1, effective July 1, 1979; 1980, ch. 295, § 24, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 396, § 15, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 12, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 96, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1988, ch. 205, § 9; 1994, ch. 196, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 48, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 16, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 17, effective June 25, 2009; 2017 ch. 73, § 1, effective June 29, 2017.

148.270.
Corporate powers of commission — Appointment of executive director — Duties — Additional staff.

The commission shall be a body corporate with usual corporate powers. Full minutes and records shall be kept of all meetings of the board and all official actions shall be recorded.

The commission shall appoint an executive director, who shall hold office during its pleasure and shall devote his entire time to the duties of his office. The executive director shall be the chief administrative officer and secretary of the commission and shall provide the staff direction and coordination in implementing the program and discharging the duties of the commission. The executive director shall serve as the administrative head of the Kentucky State Horse Park, thereby overseeing daily operations of the park. The secretary shall keep a full and true record of all the proceedings of the commission, of all books and papers ordered filed by the commission, and of all orders made by the commission or approved and confirmed by it and ordered filed, and shall be responsible to it for the safe custody and preservation of all such documents in its office. All documents shall be subject to the open records provisions of KRS 61.870 to 61.884. The commission shall designate from time to time staff persons to perform the duties of the executive director during his absence, and during the absence, the persons so designated shall possess the same powers as their principal.

The commission acting through the executive director may employ such additional staff as necessary to perform the duties and exercise the powers conferred upon it by the provisions of KRS 148.260 to 148.320.

History.
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 2, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 396, § 16, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 96, § 3, effective July 15, 1986.

148.280.
Functions of commission — Acquisition, control, and use of property — Holding of events — Contracts.

The commission:

Shall have the authority and control of such property as now is under its custody and control, and of such property as may hereafter be placed under its control or transferred to it by the State Property and Buildings Commission, for any purpose mentioned in this section;

May erect and repair buildings on the State Horse Park and make any and all necessary or proper improvements, and generally carry on a program of development and extension of facilities designed to accomplish the objectives defined in this section;

Shall promote the progress of the state and stimulate public interest in the advancement and development of the state by providing the facilities of the State Horse Park for exhibitionary, competitive, and other events relative to various aspects of the horse industry and other functions calculated to advance and enhance the tourist industry, economy, entertainment, cultural, and educational interests of the public.

The commission may take, acquire, and hold property, and all interest herein, by deed, gift, devise, bequest, lease, or by transfer from the state property so acquired in the manner provided by law.

The commission may enact by administrative regulation as provided in KRS Chapter 13A, rules governing the operation, maintenance, or use of property under its custody and control.

The commission may employ or contract with other persons, firms, or corporations the commission may deem necessary or desirable to accomplish its duties and functions; may fix the compensation and the terms of employment or contract of those employed or contracted with; and may assign to them duties and responsibilities the commission may determine, including the responsibility of actual operation of any or all of the facilities under the control of the commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 3, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 396, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 96, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1994, ch. 196, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

148.285.
Duties of commission.

The commission shall:

Formulate policies and procedures as necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS 148.260 to 148.320;

Promulgate rules and regulations as necessary to carry out the provisions of KRS 148.260 to 148.320;

Annually provide the Governor a report by January 30 and provide the General Assembly a report by January 30 showing the status of the horse industry within the Commonwealth and recommend any action necessary to preserve and strengthen that industry; and

Employ staff personnel, if any, as it may deem necessary to implement the business of the commission and the intent of KRS 148.260 to 148.320. The commission shall fix the compensation of such employees and any employee of the commission shall be reimbursed for expenses paid or incurred in the discharge of official business when approved by the commission.

History.
Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 96, § 9, effective July 15, 1986.

148.290.
Policing of State Horse Park — Speed limits.

The commission may enter into agreements with the law enforcement agency of any urban-county or counties in which the State Horse Park is located or in any adjacent county or with the Department of Kentucky State Police for proper policing of the State Horse Park. If authorized to do so by the commission and subject to KRS 61.300, the executive director may commission employees of the park as patrol officers. These patrol officers shall have all the powers of peace officers upon the property of the State Horse Park and the public property and roads traversing or immediately adjacent thereto.

The commission is authorized to establish by resolution speed limits governing the operation of motor vehicles on horse park property. Notice to the public of such speed limits shall be posted by signs or markings.

The commission may by administrative regulation establish restrictions on the use, including the operation, parking, impoundment, and removal, of golf cart-type vehicles, all-terrain vehicles as defined by KRS 189.010(24), horse trailers, and automobiles operated on State Horse Park property. The commission may prohibit the use of all-terrain vehicles on State Horse Park property.

The commission may by administrative regulation establish a permit system, including a fee schedule, for golf cart-type vehicles, require owners to purchase usage permits, and require that the usage permit be displayed on the vehicle when operated on State Horse Park property.

The commission may by administrative regulation establish a trailer permit system, including a fee schedule, for horse owners participating in events but not renting stalls at the State Horse Park.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 4, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 396, § 18, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 96, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 2002, ch. 330, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 85, § 161, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 22, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2017 ch. 73, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

148.300.
Control of activities on park grounds — Liens against exhibitors and others — Enforcement of liens.

The commission shall have exclusive control of concessions, exhibitions, shows, entertainments and attractions at any place on the State Horse Park grounds, and may under the direction of the commission operate any or all of such activities, by law.

The commission shall have a prior lien upon the property of any concessionaire, exhibitor or person, immediately upon its coming or being brought on the grounds to secure existing or future indebtedness.

Any designated employee or agent of the commission may sell the property to satisfy the indebtedness after giving ten (10) days’ notice to the owner or agent of the owner or, if notice cannot be given to the owner, after a notice is posted for ten (10) days in the office of the commission on the grounds, announcing that the property is to be sold. The commission through its designated agent, may bid on and buy the property offered for sale for the use and benefit of the State Horse Park.

History.
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.) ch. 6, § 5, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 396, § 19, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 111, § 81, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 96, § 6, effective July 15, 1986.

148.310.
Provisions of KRS Chapter 137 and KRS 92.280 not to apply.

None of the provisions of KRS Chapter 137 and none of the provisions of KRS 92.280(2) shall apply to any operations on State Horse Park grounds wherein the commission shares in the receipts and proceeds of such operations.

History.
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 6, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 396, § 20, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 96, § 7, effective July 15, 1986.

148.320.
Use of revenues — Deposit of funds — Accounts and reports.

All revenues derived by the commission from the use of properties and facilities under its custody and control shall be used exclusively for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the commission, the cost of the management and operation of such properties and facilities, the payment of interest and principal upon any indebtedness incurred by the commission for such properties and facilities, the creation of adequate reserves for the repair and replacement thereof and for the financing of further extensions, improvements, and additions thereto. Included in the cost of operation may be such promotional activities as the commission may determine upon as calculated to stimulate and increase the use and the revenues of such facilities, and to increase and stimulate the interest and usefulness of the State Horse Park.

The commission shall generally cause its funds to be deposited in the State Treasurer’s office to be withdrawn on appropriate vouchers approved by the commission.

An annual accounting of the funds of the commission shall be made by the Auditor of Public Accounts and reported to the Governor for the benefit of the Governor and the General Assembly.

History.
Enact. Acts 1979 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 7, effective July 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 396, § 21, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 96, § 8, effective July 15, 1986.